Hawaii statutes.
[§636C-8] Uniformity of interpretation.
This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general
purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it. [L 1983, c 31,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next